North Carolina, session 2025, SB852.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 58-2-40(2) is recodified as G.S. 58-2-40(b).
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 58-2-40, as amended by subsection (a) of this section, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 58-2-40. Powers and duties of Commissioner.
(a) The Commissioner shall:has the duty to do all of the following:
(1) See that all laws of this State that the Commissioner is responsible for
administering and the provisions of this Chapter are faithfully executed; and
to executed. To that end end, the Commissioner is authorized to adopt rules
rules, in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, in order to
enforce, carry out and make effective the provisions of those laws. The
Commissioner is also authorized to adopt such further rules not contrary to
those laws that will prevent persons subject to the Commissioner's regulatory
authority from engaging in practices injurious to the public.
…
(b) Have The Commissioner shall have the power and authority to adopt rules pertaining
to and governing the solicitation of proxies, including related financial reporting in connection
therewith, reporting requirements, with respect to the capital stock or other equity securities of
any domestic stock insurance company.
(c) The Commissioner shall establish a State-run Health Benefits Exchange, as provided
for under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (P.L. 111-148), as amended, or
other applicable federal law and regulations. The Commissioner has the authority to do all of the
following:
(1) Change any established program, adopt or amend any rule, or establish or
change any policy, guideline, or plan as necessary to implement, establish,
create, administer, or otherwise operate the Exchange.
(2) Apply for and accept federal moneys related to the creation, implementation,
or operation of the Exchange.
(3) Create any advisory board or committee for providing recommendations on
the creation, implementation, or operation of the Exchange."
SECTION 2. G.S. 143B-24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-24. Cooperative agreements; prohibition regarding Health Benefit
Exchanges.agreements.
*S852-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(b) The General Assembly reserves the authority to define the State's level of interaction,
if any, with the federally facilitated Health Benefit Exchange that will operate in the State. No
department, agency, or institution of this State shall enter into any contracts or commit any
resources for the provision of any services related to the federally facilitated Health Benefit
Exchange under a "Partnership" Exchange model, except as authorized by the General Assembly.
No department, agency, or institution of this State shall take any actions not authorized by the
General Assembly toward the formation of a State-run Health Benefit Exchange. It is not the
intent of this section to prohibit State-federal interaction that does not pursue a State-run
Exchange or "Partnership" Exchange model."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Insurance the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in recurring funds beginning in
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to establish and operate a State-run Health Benefits
Exchange, as authorized under G.S. 58-2-40(c).
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 852-First Edition